Georgia, session 2025_26, SB221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 24A of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to massage
therapy practice, is amended by revising paragraph (6) of subsection (b) of Code
Section 43-24A-8, relating to licensure of massage therapists, application, and requirements,
as follows:
"(6) The applicant has completed successfully a board recognized massage therapy
educational program consisting of a minimum of 500 625 hours of course and clinical
work;"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 221
- 1 -